Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 19

Grants for Development of Blighted Properties

7-51-1901. Public policy — Purpose.

It is the public policy of this state that a mechanism should be created to enable local governments to provide grants which would encourage housing development or encourage the repair, rebuilding and renovations of existing facilities and structures in neighborhoods whose stability depends upon the elimination of blight and the upgrading of structural needs of a facility.

Remodeling and eliminating blight serves a valid public purpose for the stabilization of the value of the neighborhood and increases the value of the facility being rehabilitated.

Acts 2012, ch. 832, § 2.

7-51-1902. Part definitions — Authority to develop grant programs.

As used in this part:

“Blighted” has the meaning ascribed to that term in title 13, chapters 20 and 21; and

“Local government” means a municipality, county or county having a metropolitan form of government.

Local governments are authorized to develop grant programs to be paid from the general fund of the local government to homeowners and developers who invest in blighted property for the purpose of stabilizing the value of the neighborhood and increasing the value of the facilities being constructed or rehabilitated which are located on blighted property.

Acts 2012, ch. 832, § 3.

7-51-1903. Submission of grant program to attorney general and reporter for review and approval.

Prior to offering any grants under a program developed by the local government, the local government shall submit the grant program to the attorney general and reporter for the review and approval of the attorney general and reporter to ensure the grants will not be offered in an arbitrary and capricious manner and in no way violate:

Constitutional requirements of Tennessee Constitution, Article II, § 28 requiring equal and uniform taxation of property; and

Section 29-17-102(2).

Acts 2012, ch. 832, § 4.